Utah statutes.
31A-5-503.   Merger and consolidation of mutuals.
Any two or more mutuals may merge or consolidate, under the procedures set
forth under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act.  All
mergers of mutuals are subject to Chapter 16.
